Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2617
Administrative penalty.

The Secretary of State
may assess a civil penalty against an athlete agent not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars for a violation of the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 17.